District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.92

Repealed

Liquidation proceedings — Qualifications of receivers.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 218, ch. 269, § 92
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.92.
1981 Ed., § 29-392.
1973 Ed., § 29-931d.